Tennessee statutes. Title 23 Attorneys-at-law
Chapter 4

Lawyers' Assistance Programs

23-4-101. Civil immunity.

A person who in good faith reports information or takes action in connection with a lawyers' assistance program, or a person who receives information in connection with a lawyers' assistance program, is immune from civil liability for reporting the information, taking the action or taking no action; provided, that the person has acted in good faith and without malice.

Acts 1993, ch. 359, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 33.

Comparative Legislation. Immunity from civil liability for persons taking actions in connection with lawyer assistance programs:

Ark. Code §16-22-310.

23-4-102. Presumption of good faith.

A member of a lawyers' assistance program, or person reporting information to a lawyers' assistance program, is presumed to have acted in good faith and without malice. A person alleging lack of good faith has the burden of proving bad faith and malice.

Acts 1993, ch. 359, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 33.

23-4-103. Persons entitled to immunity.

The civil immunity provided in this chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. The persons entitled to immunity under this chapter include:

A lawyers assistance program approved by the Tennessee supreme court that provides assistance to attorneys suspected of having an impaired ability to practice law because of abuse of alcohol or other drugs, or because of any other physical or mental infirmity causing impairment;

A member, employee or agent of the program, association or nonprofit corporation; and

A person who reports or provides information concerning an impaired professional, including, but not limited to, persons designated to monitor or supervise the course of treatment or rehabilitation of an impaired professional.

Acts 1993, ch. 359, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 33.

23-4-104. Information subject to attorney-client privilege.

All information, in any form whatsoever, furnished to the lawyers' assistance program shall be a privileged communication and shall be governed by the laws pertaining to the attorney-client privilege.

Acts 1993, ch. 359, § 1.

23-4-105. Confidentiality of records, proceedings and communications.

The records, proceedings and all communications of any lawyers' assistance program shall be deemed confidential and shall not be available for court subpoena. This section shall not prevent the subpoena of business records that are otherwise available through subpoena. Such records are not to be construed as privileged merely because they have been provided to a lawyers' assistance committee.

Acts 1993, ch. 359, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.